src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс-п_0
+Det+Pos: п_0_inflect ;
+Pron+Pos: п_0_inflect ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_SFonly_end
+Det+Interr: SF_b ;
+Det+Rel: SF_b ;
+Pron+Interr: SF_b ;
+Pron+Rel: SF_b ;

LEXICON Dem_мс-п_SFonly_end
+Det+Dem: SF_b ;
+Pron+Dem: SF_b ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_a
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_a
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Pos_мс-п_a
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_a
+Det: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Pron: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Pron: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Pron: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Msc
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Neu
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Fem
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_inan
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_anim
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_inananim
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Nom
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Acc
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Gen
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Loc
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Dat
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_a_Ins
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_b
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Pron+Interr: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_b
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Pron+Rel: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Pos_мс-п_b
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Pron+Pos: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_b
+Det: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;
+Pron: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Pron: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Pron: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Pron: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Msc
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Neu
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Fem
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_inan
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_anim
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_inananim
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Nom
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Acc
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Gen
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Loc
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Dat
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;

! LEXICON мс-п_b_Ins
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b-либо
+Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-либо # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-либо # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b-нибудь
+Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
! +Det+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-нибудь # ;
